South Dakota, session 2026, SB155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 2-6-4 be AMENDED:
2-6-4. The Government Operations and Audit Committee may examine all records
and vouchers, summon witnesses by request or by issuing a subpoena, and thoroughly
examine all expenditures and the general management of each department of state
government.
The committee may issue a subpoena for an individual, a document, or both. The
committee may take the deposition of any witness and issue written interrogatories and
requests for production of documents or things to any person in the same manner as
discovery is conducted in a civil action.
A subpoena, written interrogatory, request for production of documents or things,
or any other discovery procedure conducted pursuant to this section must specify a return
date. The chair of the committee may extend the return date by written notice.
Upon service of a subpoena or other discovery procedure conducted pursuant to
this section, the subject of the subpoena or discovery procedure shall preserve all
responsive or potentially responsive materials in the subject's control, custody, or
possession.
The committee may use the procedure provided in chapter 21-34 to enforce its the
subpoena or discovery procedure when the subject of the subpoena or discovery
procedure refuses or fails to comply with the command to appear and testify before the
committee or comply with the discovery procedure.
If the subject of a subpoena or discovery procedure knowingly or intentionally
refuses or fails to comply by the return date, the refusal or failure creates a rebuttable
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.763.14 2 155
presumption that any withheld information would have been adverse to the interests of
the subject.
The committee may authorize one or more members of the committee, or any
other individual, to:
(1) Conduct an investigation on behalf of the committee;
(2) Use the discovery procedures the committee is authorized to use; and
(3) Use the procedure provided in chapter 21-34 to enforce the discovery procedures
of the committee.
Any individual authorized by the committee to conduct an investigation must shall
comply with all applicable state and federal laws regarding confidentiality and any
additional restrictions imposed by the committee.
The committee may authorize the director of the Legislative Research Council to
expend moneys from the legislative priority fund for the purpose of carrying out the duties
of this section.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 2-6:
For the purposes of legislative oversight and investigation, the House Judiciary
Committee and the Senate Judiciary Committee may, by majority vote of members-elect,
exercise the same subpoena authority, discovery authority, record-preservation
requirements, and enforcement mechanisms provided to the Government Operations and
Audit Committee pursuant to § 2-6-4.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 2-6:
A board, bureau, commission, department, or other agency of the state, or any of
its political subdivisions, may not dismiss, suspend from employment, demote, decrease
the compensation of, or take any other retaliatory action against an employee, or retaliate
against a consultant or contractor, who, in good faith, provides testimony, produces
records, or otherwise cooperates with an audit, investigation, subpoena, or discovery
procedure conducted pursuant to § 2‑6‑4, 2-6-4.1, or 4‑11‑4.
In addition to any available administrative remedy, an individual who is aggrieved
by a violation of this section may bring a civil action in circuit court. Upon finding that a
violation of this section occurred, the court may award or grant any of the following:
(1) Actual damages;
(2) Back pay;
(3) Contract damages;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.763.14 3 155
(4) Injunctive relief;
(5) Reasonable attorney fees and costs;
(6) Reinstatement or restoration of contract status, if feasible;
(7) Upon finding that the retaliation was knowing and intentional, treble damages; and
(8) If the protected activity results in recovery of state moneys, imposition of civil
penalties, or an order of criminal restitution, a whistleblower reward, not exceeding
the lesser of ten percent of the amount recovered or fifty thousand dollars.
Section 4. That § 2-12-8.2 be AMENDED:
2-12-8.2. No An elected officer, department or agency head, or division director,
or the highest paid employee reporting to such person any elected officer, department or
agency head, or division director may be not:
(1) Be compensated, act, or register as a lobbyist, other than a public employee
lobbyist, during a period of two years after that person's officer or employee's
termination of service in the state government; or
(2) Accept employment, compensation, or services from, or enter into a contract with,
a person if the officer or employee is in a position to participate, or if the officer or
employee participated within the twenty-four months immediately preceding
termination of service in the state government, substantially in the approval,
award, or recommendation of, or deliberation or negotiation regarding, a specific
discretionary state contract, grant, loan, tax incentive, or any other state financial
assistance exceeding one hundred thousand dollars, which benefited the person,
provided that this subdivision does not apply to any benefit pursuant to a
standardized, non‑discretionary formula generally available to similarly situated
applicants.
An officer or employee who intentionally and knowingly violates subdivision (2) is
guilty of theft pursuant to § 22-30A-46.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor 6 felony.
Section 5. That § 22-30A-46 be AMENDED:
22-30A-46. Any public official who knowingly uses funds moneys or property that
has been entrusted to the public official in violation of, the use of which violates the public
trust and that results in a direct financial benefit to the public official, commits a direct
criminal conflict of interest.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.763.14 4 155
A public official who acts for the purpose of securing, and as a result obtains, a
promise, agreement, understanding, or expectation of future employment, compensation,
or other thing of value commits an indirect criminal conflict of interest.
Any public official who commits a direct or indirect criminal conflict of interest is
guilty of theft.
Upon finding by clear and convincing evidence that a public official violated this
section, a circuit court having jurisdiction over the matter shall order:
(1) Disgorgement of all benefits, compensation, or anything else of value obtained as
a result of the public official's violation; and
(2) Restitution to the state or affected governmental entity.
A public official whose violation of this section involves a value of one hundred
thousand dollars or more, repeated misconduct, or a clear abuse of a position of public
trust, is guilty of a Class 5 felony.
For purposes of this section, "a clear abuse of a position of public trust" means a
deliberate or reckless misuse of authority or resources entrusted to a public official, which
is detrimental to the public interest.
For purposes of this section, "direct financial benefit" means a personal monetary
gain received from the use of public moneys or property.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.